California statutes. Water Code
A. “Goose Lake Basin” shall mean the drainage area of Goose Lake within the States of California and Oregon and all closed basins included in the Goose Lake drainage basin as delineated on the official map of the Goose Lake Basin which is attached to and made a part of this compact.

B. “Person” shall mean the States of Oregon and California, any individual and any other entity, public or private.

C. “Water,” “waters” or “water resources” shall mean any water appearing on the surface of the ground in streams, lakes, or otherwise, and any water beneath the land surface or beneath the bed of any stream, lake, reservoir or other body of surface water within the boundaries of Goose Lake Basin. 
Article III.Distribution and Use of Water
A. There are hereby recognized vested rights to the use of waters originating in Goose Lake Basin existing as of the effective date of this compact and established under the laws of California and Oregon.

B. Except as provided in this article, this compact shall not be construed as affecting or interfering with appropriation under the laws of California and
 Oregon of unappropriated waters of Goose Lake Basin for use within the basin.

C. Export of water from Goose Lake Basin for use outside the basin without prior consent of both state legislatures is prohibited.

D. Each state hereby grants the right for a person to construct and operate facilities for the measurement, diversion, storage and conveyance of water from the Goose Lake Basin in one state for use within the basin in the other state, providing the right to such use is secured by appropriation under the general laws administered by the State Engineer of the State of Oregon or the Water Rights Board of California and the laws of the state from which the water is to be taken shall control.

E. Should any facilities be constructed in one state to implement use of water in the other state, the construction,
 operation, repairs and replacement of such facilities shall be subject to the laws of the state in which the facilities are constructed. 
Article IV.Administration
No commission or administrative body is necessary to administer this compact. 
Article V.Termination
This compact may be terminated at any time by consent of the legislatures of California and Oregon and upon such termination all rights then established hereunder shall continue unimpaired. 
Article VI.General Provisions
Nothing in this
 compact shall be construed to limit, or prevent any state from instituting or maintaining any action or proceeding, legal or equitable, in any court having jurisdiction thereof for the protection of any right under this compact or the enforcement of any of its provisions. 
Article VII.Ratification
A. This compact shall become operative when ratified by the legislatures of California and Oregon and consented to by the Congress of the United States.

B. This compact shall remain in full force and effect until amended in the same manner as is required for it to be ratified to become operative or until terminated.

C. A copy of any proposed amendments to or termination of this compact shall be
 filed with the Board of Supervisors of Modoc County, California, and the County Court of Lake County, Oregon, at least 30 days prior to any legislative consideration by the legislatures of the States of California and Oregon. 
Article VIII.Federal Rights
Nothing in this compact shall be deemed:

A. To impair or affect the existing rights or powers of the United States of America, its agencies, or instrumentalities, in and to the use of the waters of the Goose Lake Basin nor its capacity to acquire rights in and to the use of said waters.

B. To subject any property of the United States of America, its agencies or instrumentalities, to taxation by any state or subdivision thereof, nor to create an obligation on
 the part of the United States of America, its agencies or instrumentalities by reason of the acquisition, construction or operation of any property or works of whatsoever kind, to make any payments to any state or political subdivision thereof, state agency, municipality or entity, whatsoever in reimbursement for the loss of taxes.

C. To subject any property of the United States of America, its agencies or instrumentalities, to the laws of any state to any extent other than the extent to which these laws would apply without regard to the compact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1059.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3. DAMS AND RESERVOIRS [6000. - 6700.]



PART 1. SUPERVISION OF DAMS AND RESERVOIRS [6000. - 6470.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [6000. - 6009.]

6000.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6002.

“Dam” means any artificial barrier, together with appurtenant works, which does or may impound or divert water, and which either (a) is or will be 25 feet or more in height from the natural bed of the stream or watercourse at the downstream toe of the barrier, as determined by the department, or from the lowest elevation of the outside limit of the barrier, as determined by the department, if it is not across a stream channel or watercourse, to the maximum possible water storage elevation or (b) has or will have an impounding capacity of 50 acre-feet or more.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6002.5.

“Critical appurtenant structure” means a water surface barrier or hydraulic control structure that is 25 feet or more in height, that impounds 5,000 acre-feet of water or more, or that the department determines poses a significant downstream hazard potential.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 84.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6003.

(a) Any barrier that is or will be not in excess of six feet in height, regardless of storage capacity, or that has or will have a storage capacity not in excess of 15 acre-feet, regardless of height, shall not be considered a dam.

(b) (1) Any barrier that does not impound water above the top of a levee where maximum storage behind the barrier has a minimum of three feet of freeboard on the levee and is a weir shall not be considered a dam.

(2) This subdivision shall apply only to Peoples Weir, Reynolds Weir, Last Chance Weir, Lemoore Diversion Weir, Island Weir, Crescent Weir, Stinson Weir, Empire Weir No. 1, and Empire Weir No. 2.

(c) For purposes of this section, a “weir” is defined as an agricultural water delivery structure with either mechanically or manually removable flashboards or gates that serves to regulate the flow of water in a stream and that functions as part of a federal flood control system as defined by Part 208 (commencing with Section 208.10) of Chapter II of Title 33 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 617, Sec. 1.   (AB 639)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6004.

(a) An obstruction in a canal used to raise or lower water therein or divert water therefrom, a levee, including, but not limited to, a levee on the bed of a natural lake with the primary purpose to control floodwaters, a railroad fill or structure, a road or highway fill or structure, a circular tank constructed of steel or concrete, or both, a tank elevated above the ground, and a barrier that is not across a stream channel, watercourse, or natural drainage area and that has the principal purpose of impounding water for agricultural use shall not be considered a dam.

(b) An obstruction in the channel of a stream or watercourse that is 15 feet or less in height from the lowest elevation of the obstruction and that has the single purpose of spreading water within the bed of the stream or watercourse upstream from the obstruction for percolation underground shall not be considered a dam.

(c) The levee of an island adjacent to tidal waters in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta, as defined in Section 12220, even when used to impound water, shall not be considered a dam and the impoundment shall not be considered a reservoir if the maximum possible water storage elevation of the impounded water does not exceed four feet above mean sea level, as established by the United States Geological Survey 1929 datum.

(d) A noncircular tank, constructed of steel or concrete, or both, that is constructed in a county of the third class by a public agency, under the supervision of a civil engineer registered in the state, that does not exceed 75 acre-feet in capacity or 30 feet in height, and a barrier that is not across a stream channel, watercourse, or natural drainage area and that has the principal use as a sewage sludge drying facility, shall not be considered a dam.

(e) (1) A regulating basin owned or operated by a public entity that is not across a stream channel, watercourse, or natural drainage shall not be considered a dam if all of the following criteria are met:

(A) The barrier constructed to form the regulating basin has
 a height of no more than 15 feet from the crest to the lowest downstream elevation where the barrier meets natural ground.

(B) The regulating basin has a storage capacity of no more than 1,500 acre-feet.

(C) The regulating basin, at the time of construction, does not have a downstream hazard classification of “high” or “extremely high,” based upon the department’s criteria for those determinations.

(D) The regulating basin is designed, and its construction is overseen, by a licensed civil engineer.

(E) The regulating basin is compliant with the general plan of the county in which it is located.

(2) In order for a regulating basin to qualify for the exclusion under paragraph (1), the owner
 or operator of the regulating basin shall do all of the following:

(A) Before the construction of the regulating basin, submit to the department an inundation map, stamped by a licensed civil engineer, identifying the flow and depth of water from the regulating basin in the event of a failure of a barrier constructed to form the regulating basin.

(B) Undertake an inspection, conducted by a licensed civil engineer, of all barriers and all appurtenant structures of the regulating basin every two years following the regulating basin’s construction, and make the report available on the operating agency’s internet website.

(C) Immediately upon the identification of a failure or the risk of failure of a barrier or works critical to the safe operation of the regulating basin, notify the county sheriff and local emergency
 managers of all properties likely to be impacted by a failure, in accordance with the identification of those properties on the map submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Licensed civil engineer” means a civil engineer licensed pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) “Natural drainage” means a land area over which seasonal precipitation or natural spring water accumulates and is channelized directly into a stream or watercourse.

(3) “Regulating basin” means a reservoir constructed to impound and manage the inflow and delivery of water for agricultural uses or for the purpose of groundwater recharge or other
 actions undertaken to implement the Sustainable Groundwater Management Act (Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720) of Division 6).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 943, Sec. 1.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6004.5.

“Reservoir” means any reservoir which contains or will contain the water impounded by a dam.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6005.

“Owner” includes any of the following who own, control, operate, maintain, manage, or propose to construct a dam or reservoir:

(a)The state and its departments, institutions, agencies, and political subdivisions.

(b) Every municipal or quasi-municipal corporation.

(c) Every public utility.

(d) Every district.

(e) Every person.

(f) The duly authorized agents, lessees, or trustees of any of the foregoing. 

(g) Receivers or trustees appointed by any court for any of the foregoing.

“Owner” does not include the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6006.

“Alterations,” “repairs,” or either of them, mean only such alterations or repairs as may affect the safety of the dam or reservoir.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6007.

“Enlargement” means any change in or addition to an existing dam or reservoir, which raises or may raise the water storage elevation of the water impounded by the dam or reservoir.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6008.

Water storage elevation means that elevation of water surface which could be obtained by the existing dam or reservoir, as previously operated, were there no outflow and were the reservoir full of water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6009.

“State jurisdictional dam” means a dam not wholly under the control of the federal government.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 85.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. General Provisions [6025. - 6032.]

6025.

It is the intent of the Legislature by this part to provide for the regulation and supervision of dams and reservoirs exclusively by the State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6025.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision, subject to subdivision (b), the requirements for state regulation and supervision of safety of dams, as contained in this division, shall not be applicable to waste water treatment and storage ponds constructed as a part of a waste water control facility.

(b) This section applies to those ponds specified in subdivision (a) only after the governing body of the city, county, district, or other agency which operates the waste water control facility adopts a resolution which (1) finds that the ponds have been constructed and operated to standards adequate to protect life and property, and (2) provides that the city, county, district, or other agency shall supervise and regulate the design, construction, operation enlargement, replacement, and removal of the ponds after the effective date of the resolution. 

(c) This section applies only to ponds specified in subdivision (a) which (1) have a maximum height of 15 feet or less and a maximum storage capacity of 1,500 acre-feet or less, (2) have been designed by, and constructed under the supervision of, a registered civil engineer, and (3) are not across a stream channel or watercourse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1027, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6025.6.

(a) An owner of a structure defined as a dam pursuant to Section 6002, but excluded from that definition pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 6004 or otherwise exempted from the requirements of this chapter pursuant to Section 6025.5, shall comply with the requirements of Section 6161 and shall employ a civil engineer who is registered in the state to supervise the structure for the protection of life and property for the full operating life of the structure.

(b) (1) The civil engineer supervising a dam pursuant to
 subdivision (a) shall take into consideration, in determining whether or not a dam constitutes, or would constitute, a danger to life or property, the possibility that the dam might be endangered by seepage, earth movement, or other conditions that exist, or might occur, in any area in the vicinity of the dam.

(2) If the civil engineer determines that a dam under his or her supervision constitutes, or would constitute, a danger to life or property, the civil engineer shall notify the owner of the dam and recommend appropriate action.

(c) The owner shall submit to the department the name, business address, and telephone number of each supervising civil engineer.

(d) The department shall submit the information provided pursuant to subdivision (c) to the Office of Emergency Services on or before January 1, 1995, and on
 or before each January 1 thereafter. Any change in the information shall be submitted to the department on or before July 1 of each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 86.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6026.

No city or county has authority, by ordinance enacted by the legislative body thereof or adopted by the people under the initiative power, or otherwise, to regulate, supervise, or provide for the regulation or supervision of any dams or reservoirs in this state, or the construction, maintenance, or operation thereof, nor to limit the size of any dam or reservoir or the amount of water which may be stored therein. This part shall not prevent a city or county from adopting ordinances regulating, supervising, or providing for the regulation or supervision of dams and reservoirs that (a) are not within the state’s jurisdiction, or (b) are not subject to regulation by another public agency or body.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6027.

Whenever supervision of safety of design or construction of a proposed or existing dam or reservoir is exercised by the United States or any of its agencies pursuant to a jurisdiction superior to that of the state, and the requirements made under authority of such jurisdiction are so contradictory with requirements made by the department under this part that a compliance cannot be made which will meet both federal and state requirements, then the state requirements shall be modified by the department sufficiently to make possible compliance with both federal and state requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6028.

No action shall be brought against the state or the department or its agents or employees for the recovery of damages caused by the partial or total failure of any dam or reservior or through the operation of any dam or reservoir upon the ground that such defendant is liable by virtue of any of the following:

(a) The approval of the dam or reservoir.

(b) The issuance or enforcement of orders relative to maintenance or operation of the dam or reservoir.

(c) Control and regulation of the dam or reservoir.

(d) Measures taken to protect against failure during an emergency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6029.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to relieve an owner or operator of a dam or reservoir of the legal duties, obligations, or liabilities incident to the ownership or operation of the dam or reservoir.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6030.

The findings and orders of the department and the certificate of approval of any dam or reservoir issued by the department are final and conclusive and binding upon all state agencies, regulatory or otherwise, as to the safety of design, construction, maintenance, and operation of any dam or reservoir.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6031.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to deprive any owner of such recourse to the courts as he may be entitled to under the laws of this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6032.

If a dam is owned by one or more persons or entities, the owners shall form or delegate legal and financial authority to a single entity that is responsible for the operation and maintenance of the dam, as well as the payment of any fees or other costs associated with dam ownership.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 87.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Administrative Provisions [6052. - 6056.]

6052.

The department shall employ such clerical, engineering, and other assistants as are necessary for carrying on the work of dam and reservoir supervision in accordance with this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6053.

The department may employ consultants.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6054.

When the safety and technical considerations pertaining to a certificate of approval, dam, reservoir, or plans and specifications require it, or when requested in writing to do so by the owner, the department shall appoint a consulting board of two or more consultants to report to the department on the safety features involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6055.

The cost and expense of a consulting board if appointed on the request of an owner shall be paid by the owner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6056.

The department shall retain a board of three consultants who shall make an independent report to the director upon the issuance, modification, or renewal of any certificate of approval for any dam owned by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Powers of the Department [6075. - 6162.]



  ARTICLE 1. Powers in General [6075. - 6081.]

6075.

The department, under the police power of the state, shall supervise the construction, enlargement, alteration, repair, maintenance, operation, and removal of dams and reservoirs for the protection of life and property as provided in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6076.

All dams and reservoirs in the state are under the jurisdiction of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6077.

It is unlawful to construct, enlarge, repair, alter, remove, maintain, or operate any dam or reservoir except upon approval of the department as provided in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6078.

The department shall adopt and revise from time to time such rules and regulations and issue such general orders as may be necessary for carrying out, but not inconsistent with, the provisions of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6079.

In carrying out the provisions of this part the department may cooperate with the United States or any of its agencies.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6080.

In making any investigations or inspections required or authorized by this part the department or its representatives may enter upon private property as may be necessary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6081.

In determining whether or not a dam or reservoir or proposed dam or reservoir constitutes or would constitute a danger to life or property, the department shall take into consideration the possibility that the dam or reservoir might be endangered by seepage, earth movement, or other conditions which exist or which might occur in any area in the vicinity of the dam or reservoir. Whenever the department deems that any such condition endangers a dam or reservoir, it shall order the owner to take such action as the department determines to be necessary to remove the resultant danger to life and property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Maintenance and Operation [6100. - 6103.]

6100.

Supervision over the maintenance and operation of dams and reservoirs insofar as necessary to safeguard life and property from injury by reason of the failure thereof is vested in the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6101.

The department may require owners to keep records of, and to report on, maintenance, operation, staffing, and engineering and geologic investigations and shall issue such rules and regulations and orders as necessary to secure maintenance and operation and to require staffing and engineering and geologic investigations which will safeguard life and property. In addition, the owner of a dam or reservoir or his agent shall fully and promptly advise the department of any sudden or unprecedented flood or unusual or alarming circumstance or occurrence affecting the dam or reservoir.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6102.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Division of Safety of Dams as part of the department inspects and
 reevaluates its jurisdictional dams and reservoirs for the purpose of determining their safety.

(b) Globally and nationally, there is recognition that, as with all aging infrastructure, there is an unmet need regarding dam maintenance and
 repairs. California needs to continue to lead efforts
 to address these unmet needs, and improve upon standards set by regulatory agencies to ensure public safety.

(c) In order to ensure the safe operation of dams and to maintain public confidence in dam safety, the Division of Safety of Dams must inspect dams within its jurisdiction once per fiscal year with the exception of low hazard potential dams which will receive inspections every two fiscal years at a minimum. California’s dam safety procedures must stay on par with, or ahead of, best practices and must continually update those procedures based on the best
 available knowledge.

(d) In order to ensure that the practices of the Division of Safety of Dams continue to reflect the best available knowledge, and in light of the recommendations arising from the independent Forensic Team’s review of the Oroville Dam spillway incident, the Division must consult with independent dam safety and dam safety risk management organizations to propose additions to the Division’s existing dam safety program in order to incorporate updated best practices to ensure public safety, as set forth in Section 6103.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 3, Sec. 2.   (AB 1270)   Effective February 26, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6102.5.

(a) The department shall inspect dams, reservoirs, and appurtenant structures to verify their safety in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) A facility that has been determined by the department, pursuant to Section 6160, to have a hazard classification of significant, high, or extremely high, shall be inspected at least once per fiscal year.

(2) A facility that has been determined by the department, pursuant to Section 6160, to have a hazard classification of low shall be inspected at least once every two fiscal years.

(b) The department shall require
 owners to perform, at the owner’s expense, work as necessary to disclose information sufficient to enable the department to determine conditions of dams, reservoirs, and critical appurtenant structures regarding their safety and to perform, at the owner’s expense, other work necessary to secure maintenance and operation that will safeguard life and property. An inspection pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include, but is not limited to, visual inspection of major features of the dam, including its groins, abutments, and toe areas, the dam’s spillway, and the dam’s outlet works. The inspection shall also evaluate seepage and instrumentation, and include a review of available geological data and existing geological conditions.

(c) An owner of a dam shall operate critical outlet and spillway control features on an annual basis and shall
 demonstrate their full operability in the presence of the department every three years or as directed by the department.

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), dam inspection reports conducted by the Division of Safety of Dams shall be public records subject to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the department, in accordance with applicable law and in consultation with the dam owner and relevant local, state, or federal public safety entities, may withhold from public release sensitive data, images, or other information that discloses a dam’s vulnerability or poses a security threat.

(B) If the department withholds information pursuant to subparagraph (A), the department shall include in the public release a statement of findings that the withheld information would disclose a dam’s vulnerability or pose a security threat, as described in subparagraph (A).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 429.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

6103.

(a) (1) On or before January 1, 2019, the Division of Safety of Dams, in consultation with independent, national dam safety and dam safety risk management organizations, including, but not limited to, the Association of State Dam Safety Officials and the United States Society on Dams, shall propose amendments to its dam safety inspection and reevaluation protocols to incorporate updated best practices, including risk management, to ensure public
 safety.

(2) Each proposed amendment, at minimum, shall provide an estimated range of potential cost to implement the new protocol and resulting required remediation, if any. The proposed amendments shall specify which dams the protocol applies to.

(3) The amendments
 proposed in paragraph (1) shall provide, at a minimum, that re-evaluations of extremely high hazard and high hazard dams include the review of the original design and construction, geotechnical, structural, hydraulic, hydrological, geologic, seismic hazard, monitoring and instrumentation, and overall dam performance, as applicable to the feature being re-evaluated.

(b) (1) Every ten years, the Division of Safety of Dams, in consultation with national dam safety organizations, shall reassess the previously adopted amendments and propose additional
 amendments as necessary. This section does not preclude more frequent revisions as needed.

(2) The department shall notify dam owners and the Legislature of the Division of Safety of Dams’ intent to update its dam safety inspection and reevaluation protocols prior to amending the protocols. The department shall also provide notice on its public Internet Web site of the planned update and the schedule for the update.

(3) The department shall make its dam safety inspection and reevaluation protocols and any updates to the protocols available on its Internet Web site.

(c) (1) The
 department
 shall report to the Governor and the Legislature on the amendments developed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) and shall continue to coordinate with appropriate federal entities.

(2) A report to be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 3, Sec. 4.   (AB 1270)   Effective February 26, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Emergency Work [6110. - 6113.]

6110.

The department shall immediately employ any remedial means necessary to protect life and property if either:

(a) The condition of any dam or reservoir is so dangerous to the safety of life or property as not to permit of time for the issuance and enforcement of an order relative to maintenance or operation.

(b) Passing or imminent floods threaten the safety of any dam or reservoir.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6111.

In applying the remedial means provided for in this article, the department may in emergency do any of the following:

(a) Lower the water level by releasing water from the reservoir.

(b) Completely empty the reservoir.

(c) Take such other steps as may be essential to safeguard life and property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6112.

The department shall continue in full charge and control of such dam or reservoir, or both, and its appurtenances until they are rendered safe or the emergency occasioning the action has ceased.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6113.

The cost and expenses of the remedial means provided in this article, including cost of any work done to render a dam or reservoir or its appurtenances safe, shall be recoverable by the state from the owner by action brought by the department in the superior court of the county wherein the dam or reservoir or any part thereof is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Investigations and Studies [6120. - 6121.]

6120.

For the purpose of enabling it to make decisions as compatible with economy and public safety as possible the department shall make or cause to be made such investigations and shall gather or cause to be gathered such data as may be needed for a proper review and study of the various features of the design and construction of dams, reservoirs, and appurtenances.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6121.

The department shall also make or cause to be made such watershed investigations and studies as may facilitate its decisions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Action and Procedure to Restrain Violations [6150. - 6157.]

6150.

The department may commence an action or proceeding under this article, either by mandamus or injunction, for the purpose of stopping or preventing violations or threatened violations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6151.

An action or proceeding under this article may be commenced whenever any owner or any person acting as a director, officer, agent, or employee of any owner, or any contractor or agent or employee of such contractor is:

(a) Failing or omitting or about to fail or omit to do anything required of him by this part or by any approval, order, rule, regulation, or requirement of the department under the authority of this part; or

(b) Doing or permitting anything or about to do or permit anything to be done in violation of or contrary to this part or any approval, order, rule, regulation, or requirement of the department under this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6152.

Any action or proceeding under this article shall be commenced in the superior court in and for the county in which (a) the cause or some part thereof arose, (b) the owner or person complained of has its principal place of business, or (c) the person complained of resides.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6153.

Any action or proceeding under this article shall be brought by petition in the superior court, alleging the violation or threatened violation complained of, and praying for appropriate relief by way of mandamus or injunction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6154.

The court shall specify a time, not exceeding 20 days after the service of the copy of the petition, within which the owner or person complained of shall answer the petition, and in the meantime the owner or person may be restrained.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6155.

In case of default in answer or after answer the court shall immediately inquire into the facts and circumstances of the case.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6156.

The court may join such parties as it deems necessary or proper in order to make its judgment, order, or writ effective.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6157.

The final judgment in such action or proceeding shall either dismiss the action or proceeding or direct that the writ of mandamus or injunction issue or be made permanent as prayed for in the petition, or in such modified or other form as will afford appropriate relief.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Inundation Maps and Emergency Planning [6160. - 6162.]

6160.

(a) An owner of a dam that is regulated by the state is responsible for emergency preparedness with regard to the potential for loss of life and property resulting from the failure of a dam, as defined in Section 6002, or a critical appurtenant structure, as defined in Section 6002.5.

(b) (1) Not later than July 1, 2017, the department shall classify the public safety risk of all state jurisdictional dams, based on downstream hazard potential and reviews of critical appurtenant structures, in accordance with, at a minimum, guidelines set forth by the Federal Emergency Management Agency. The department shall notify the owner of a dam of the hazard classification of the owner’s dam.

(2) The department may revise a dam’s classification to reflect changes in downstream population, critical infrastructure, and land use. The department shall notify the affected dam owner of any changes in the hazard classification of the owner’s dam.

(3) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the classification of the public safety risk by the department on or before July 1, 2017, pursuant to this section is not subject to review or approval by the Office of Administrative Law.

(c) The owner of a dam that is regulated by the state, except a dam classified by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) as low hazard, shall prepare an emergency action plan pursuant to Section 8589.5 of the Government Code.

(d) An owner of a dam that is jointly regulated by the state and the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission shall prepare an emergency action plan in accordance with Federal Energy Regulatory Commission guidelines.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 88.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6161.

(a) (1) An owner of a state jurisdictional dam, except an owner of a dam classified by the department pursuant to Section 6160 as a low hazard dam, shall submit electronically to the department an inundation map that shows the area that would be subject to flooding under various failure scenarios unique to the dam and the critical appurtenant structures of the dam.

(2) Before approval of an inundation map, the department shall review the map and may require the owner to make changes that the department deems necessary.

(3) Upon approval of the inundation map or maps by the department, the owner of the dam